Arkansas, session 2025, HB1002.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION - AUDITOR OF STATE DISBURSEMENTS. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Auditor of State, to be payable from the
Constitutional Officers Fund, for personal services and operating expenses of
the Auditor of State - General Appropriations for the fiscal year ending June
30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) DISTRICT JUDGES TRAVEL EXPENSE
REIMBURSEMENT $80,000
(02) SPECIAL/RECALLED JUDGES FOR THE
CIRCUIT COURTS 350,000
(03) TRIAL JUDGES EXPENSES 400,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $830,000
*JAR028*
01/13/2025 8:32:16 AM JAR028

HB1002

SECTION 2. APPROPRIATION - HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Arkansas House of Representatives, to be payable from
the Constitutional Officers Fund, for reimbursements to Representatives for
interim expenses incurred as authorized by law of the Arkansas House of
Representatives for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) INTERIM EXPENSE REIMBURSEMENTS FOR
REPRESENTATIVES $368,000

SECTION 3. APPROPRIATION - ARKANSAS SENATE. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Arkansas Senate, to be payable from the Constitutional
Officers Fund, for reimbursements to Senators for interim expenses incurred
as authorized by law of the Arkansas Senate for the fiscal year ending June
30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) INTERIM EXPENSE REIMBURSEMENTS FOR
SENATORS $200,000

SECTION 4. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
DISBURSING OFFICER. The Auditor of State shall be disbursing officer for the
funds appropriated for Auditor of State Disbursements herein.

SECTION 5. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. SENATE
DISBURSEMENTS. The Secretary of the Senate shall be disbursing officer for
the funds appropriated for Interim Expense Reimbursements for Senators
herein.

SECTION 6. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. HOUSE
01/13/2025 8:32:16 AM JAR028

HB1002
DISBURSEMENTS. The Chief of Staff or his designee of the House of
Representatives shall be disbursing officer for the funds appropriated for
Interim Expense Reimbursements for Representatives herein.

SECTION 7. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. HOUSE
INTERIM EXPENSE DISBURSEMENTS. The appropriations authorized for House of
Representatives shall be used for making reimbursements for interim expenses
incurred by members of the House of Representatives.

SECTION 8. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. SENATE
INTERIM EXPENSE DISBURSEMENTS. The appropriations authorized for Arkansas
Senate shall be used for making reimbursements for interim expenses incurred
by members of the Senate.

SECTION 9. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
LEGISLATIVE INSTITUTE. Members of the preceding General Assembly and the
newly elected members of the House of Representatives and Senate shall be
eligible to attend the biennial Institute of Legislative Procedure and shall
be entitled, upon filing claim therefore, to per diem in the amount fixed by
law for members of the General Assembly to receive for attendance at
Legislative sessions, for each day in attending the biennial Institute of
Legislative Procedure plus mileage for traveling from their place of
residence to the biennial Institute of Legislative Procedure and return.

SECTION 10. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. JUDICIAL
DISBURSEMENTS. The Auditor of State shall be disbursing officer for the
funds appropriated for Travel Expense Reimbursements for Judges herein.
Disbursement of funds shall be subject to review by the Auditor of State for
accuracy and consistency with applicable travel guidelines. Any request for
reimbursements under the District Judges Travel Expense Reimbursement line
item must be submitted to the Auditor of State within sixty (60) days of end
date for the underlying travel or expense.
01/13/2025 8:32:16 AM JAR028

HB1002

SECTION 11. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the General
Assembly that any funds disbursed under the authority of the appropriations
contained in this act shall be in compliance with the stated reasons for
which this act was adopted, as evidenced by the Agency Requests, Executive
Recommendations and Legislative Recommendations contained in the budget
manuals prepared by the Department of Finance and Administration, letters, or
summarized oral testimony in the official minutes of the Arkansas Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee which relate to its passage and adoption.

SECTION 12. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits
the appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the
effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2025 is essential to the operation of
the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in
the event of an extension of the legislative session, the delay in the
effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2025 could work irreparable harm
upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental
programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act
being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health
and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2025.















01/13/2025 8:32:16 AM JAR028